Utah statutes.
75-3-615.   Appointment of special administrators.

(1)  If a special administrator is to be appointed pending the probate of a will which is the subject of a pending application or petition for probate, the court shall prefer the appointment of the person named personal representative in the decedent's last will if available and qualified.  In appropriate cases, the court may limit the powers given to the special administrator, it may appoint someone else to be special administrator, or it may otherwise act to protect the estate and interested persons.

(2)  In other cases, any proper person may be appointed special administrator.

